Hawaii statutes.
[§444-7.5] Asbestos contractors. (a)
The board shall provide for the licensure or permitted activities as a
specialty contractor of any person who engages in any activity involving the
application, enclosure, removal, encapsulation, renovation, repair, demolition,
or other disturbances of friable asbestos or asbestos-containing material that
may become friable during the activity; provided that this section shall not
apply to activities such as maintenance, repair, or removal of asbestos pipe or
sheets, vinyl asbestos floor materials or asbestos-bituminous or resinous
material as well as other activities that the board may exempt which are
incidental to the primary purpose for which the contractor holds a license and
if they were performed in a manner that no health hazard is posed to the
public, the contractor, or the contractor's employees.

(b) No person shall be licensed as an asbestos
contractor unless that person meets all requirements of subsection (c) in
addition to the requirements in section 444-11.

(c) The licensing requirements and procedures,
and the standards of conduct for individuals licensed as an asbestos contractor
shall be as provided by rules and shall include, but shall not be limited to,
provisions for the following:

(1) Examination;

(2) Registration of employees;

(3) Training, experience, and any other certification
standards for contractors and their employees;

(4) Protective equipment standards;

(5) Application, enclosure, removal, encapsulation,
renovation, repair and demolition procedures;

(6) Hazardous waste disposal;

(7) Clean-up procedures;

(8) Monitoring;

(9) Health examinations;

(10) Continuing education;

(11) Administrative procedures; and

(12) Fees.

The board shall consult with and shall initiate and
maintain cooperative agreements with the departments of health, and labor and
industrial relations, or any other state, federal, or county departments or
agencies and the University of Hawaii or their community colleges in the
development of these rules, and to develop procedures and methods for the
enforcement of any asbestos activity.

(d) The board, the departments of commerce and
consumer affairs, labor and industrial relations, and the department of health
shall have the right of entry to any job site and access to any records of the
licensee for purposes of inspection for health or safety hazards. Each agency
shall be empowered to apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an order
restraining any activity at the job site which constitutes an imminent health
or safety hazard.

(e) Any person who knowingly hinders or delays
the board or the above departments in the performance of their duties, who
knowingly fails to obtain the licenses or registrations required by this
section, or otherwise knowingly violates this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.

(f) The board may, in addition to any other
remedies provided by law, and after a hearing conducted pursuant to chapter 91,
assess a fine not to exceed $5,000 for each violation of this section. For purposes
of this subsection, each day's violation shall constitute a separate violation.
[L 1987, c 157, §2]

Cross References

Asbestos pollution control, see chapter 342P.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next